Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.051

District-based elections—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "District" means a geographic area within county boundaries and designated in a county redistricting plan, as provided in RCW 36.32.054.

(2) "District election" means a candidate from each district is elected in a general election by the voters of the district in which the candidate resides.

(3) "District nomination" means a candidate from each district is nominated in a primary election by the voters of the district in which the candidate resides.

[ 2018 c 301 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2018 c 301: "The legislature finds that the leaders of local jurisdictions should represent the interests of the communities they serve and should be accountable to all their constituents. The legislature further finds that district-based elections help to make elected officials more responsible to their constituents by bringing candidates closer to the communities from which they are elected. The legislature further finds that the districting process requires transparent and fair decision making in a bipartisan effort to ensure that districts constitute an accurate and balanced representation of the community." [ 2018 c 301 s 1.]

Short title—2018 c 301: "This act may be known and cited as the responsible representation act." [ 2018 c 301 s 11.]